Massachusetts, session 194th, H2365.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 112 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 9K the
following section:-
Section 9L. (a) For the purposes of this section, "military medical personnel" shall mean
an individual who has served as a medic in the United States Army, medical technician in the
United States Air Force, corpsman in the United States Navy or health services technician in the
United States Coast Guard and who was discharged or released from such service under
conditions other than dishonorable. In order to be eligible for participation in the program
established pursuant to this section, the military medical personnel shall be: (i) an active-duty
transitioning service member, (ii) a veteran, as defined in clause Forty-third of section 7 of
of 3

chapter 4, who has been discharged from service no longer than 1 year prior to the date of
application to the program, or (iii) a member of the National Guard or Reserve.
(b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the department of
veterans’ services, in cooperation with the department of public health and the bureau of health
professions licensure, shall establish a program through which military medical personnel may
practice and perform certain delegated acts that constitute the practice of medicine under the
order and supervision of a registered physician in the commonwealth, licensed pursuant to this
chapter; provided, that such acts shall reflect the level of training and experience of the military
medical personnel and shall be within the scope of services for which the supervising physician
can provide adequate supervision to ensure that accepted standards of medical practice are
followed. The supervising physician shall retain responsibility for the care of the patient.
(c) Any licensed physician, professional corporation of registered physicians pursuant to
chapter 156A, or licensed hospital or clinic may submit an application to the department of
public health to be certified as a participating facility in the program pursuant to this section. The
department of public health, in cooperation with the bureau of health professions licensure may,
at their discretion, approve other facilities, organizations or locations in which military medical
personnel may practice medicine under the conditions herein described.
(d) The department of veterans’ services, in cooperation with the department of public
health and the bureau of health professions licensure, shall establish program requirements for
participating military medical personnel, supervising physicians, licensees, and employers,
including, but not limited to, special limited registration for participating military medics, and the
of 3

bureau of health professions licensure shall promulgate regulations to implement the program
pursuant to this section.
of 3